Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2417
Informal probate; unavailable in certain cases.

An application for informal probate shall be declined if it relates to one or more of a known series of testamentary instruments the latest of which does not expressly revoke the earlier, except that a series consisting of a will with its codicils may be informally probated.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 95, UPC § 3-304.